Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5969SV (4) 91 dg/ko S.F. 2202 Section 1. Section 135G.1, subsection 12, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 135G.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Within twenty-four hours of a 5 residentâs admission to a subacute care facility, the subacute 6 care facility shall develop an initial treatment plan with the 7 resident. 8 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 135G.3A Insurance authorization. 9 1. If a mental health professional submits an electronic 10 request through an internet portal designated by the department 11 of health and human services for prior authorization for 12 insurance coverage for an individualâs subacute mental health 13 care service under chapter 249A or chapter 249N, the department 14 of health and human services or the managed care organization 15 responsible for administering the individualâs medical 16 assistance shall provide a determination to the mental health 17 professional for the preauthorization request as follows: 18 a. Within forty-eight hours after the date of receipt of an 19 urgent preauthorization request. 20 b. Within five calendar days after the date of receipt of a 21 nonurgent preauthorization request. 22 c. Within ten calendar days after the date of receipt of a 23 nonurgent preauthorization request involving complex or unique 24 circumstances. 25 2. The director of health and human services shall adopt 26 rules pursuant to chapter 17A as necessary to administer this 27 section. 28 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENTS OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 29 AND HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ ADMINISTRATIVE RULE 30 REVIEW. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 31 and the department of health and human services shall do all 32 of the following: 33 1. Collaborate to review each departmentâs administrative 34 rules adopted pursuant to section 135G.10 and eliminate any 35 -1- LSB 5969SV (4) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 2202 rule the departments determine impedes any of the following 1 goals without providing an equal or greater benefit: 2 a. Establishment of new subacute mental health care 3 facilities and services. 4 b. Expansion of existing subacute mental health care 5 facilities and services. 6 c. Ease of access to subacute mental health care facilities 7 and services. 8 2. Modify the departmentsâ respective rules so that the 9 requirements to employ an individual at a subacute mental 10 health care facility are less stringent than the requirements 11 for the same employment at a state mental health institute. 12 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 13 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 14